Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202649-1463
Campaign statement; statement of exemption; violations; late filing fee.

(1) Any person who fails to file a campaign statement with the commission under sections 49-1459 to 49-1463 shall pay to the commission a late filing fee of fifty dollars for each day the campaign statement remains not filed in violation of this section, not to exceed one thousand five hundred dollars.

(2) Any committee which fails to file a statement of exemption with the commission under subsection (2) of section 49-1459 shall pay to the commission a late filing fee of fifty dollars for each day the statement of exemption remains not filed in violation of this section, not to exceed four hundred fifty dollars.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 63;

Laws 1980, LB 535, § 13;

Laws 1998, LB 632, § 4;

Laws 1999, LB 416, § 12;

Laws 2006, LB 188, § 14;

Laws 2013, LB79, § 14;

Laws 2026, LB1075, § 55.
July 18, 2026